Arkansas, session 2025, HB1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS AND AID TO LOCAL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND
SPECIAL PROGRAMS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Education, to be payable from the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education Public School Fund Account, for grants and aid to local school
districts and special programs of the Department of Education - Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) 98% URT ACTUAL COLLECTION ADJUSTMENT $34,500,000
*KMW015*
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
(02) ADVANCED PLACEMENT INCENTIVE 1,275,000
(03) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING 35,783,095
(04) ARKANSAS EASTER SEALS 193,113
(05) ASSESSMENT/END OF LEVEL TESTING 20,309,189
(06) AT RISK 1,688,530
(07) BETTER CHANCE PROGRAM 114,000,000
(08) BONDED DEBT ASSISTANCE 28,455,384
(09) COMPUTER SCIENCE INITIATIVE 3,500,000
(10) CONSOLIDATION INCENTIVE 5,981,400
(11) CONTENT STANDARDS 161,000
(12) CONTENTS STANDARDS CURRICULUM FRAMEWORKS 50,000
(13) COOP EDUCATION TECH CENTERS 1,200,000
(14) COORDINATED SCHOOL HEALTH 2,000,000
(15) DECLINING ENROLLMENT 23,963,389
(16) DEPT OF CORRECTION 8,702,425
(17) DISTANCE LEARNING 4,760,000
(18) DISTANCE LEARNING OPERATIONS 7,575,000
(19) EARLY CHILDHOOD SPECIAL EDUCATION 22,897,920
(20) ECONOMIC EDUCATION 400,000
(21) EDUCATION SERVICE COOPERATIVES 6,129,270
(22) ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNERS 19,075,847
(23) ENHANCED STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT FUNDING 246,723,439
(24) ENHANCED TRANSPORTATION FUNDING 8,000,000
(25) ESA MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM 5,636,400
(25.1)FREE BREAKFAST PROGRAM 14,700,000
(26) GIFTED & TALENTED 1,560,381
(27) GRANTS TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS 67,856
(28) HUMAN DEVELOPMENT CENTER EDUCATION AID 526,150
(29) INTERVENTION BLOCK GRANTS 302,000
(30) ISOLATED FUNDING 7,896,000
(31) LEADERSHIP ACADEMY-MASTER PRINCIPAL 1,400,000
(32) MASTER PRINCIPAL BONUS 175,000
(33) MATERNITY LEAVE 3,000,000
(34) MERIT TEACHER INCENTIVE 10,000,000
(35) MINIMUM TEACHER SALARY AND RAISES 190,000,000
(36) NATIONAL BOARD OF PROF TEACHING STANDARDS 18,738,000
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
(37) NON-TRADITIONAL LICENSURE 50,000
(38) OE CHARTER FAC FUNDING AID PROGRAM 10,275,000
(39) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FUNDING 37,175,911
(40) PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE INSURANCE 142,000,000
(41) R.I.S.E. ARKANSAS 10,470,000
(42) RESIDENTIAL CENTERS/JUVENILE DETENTION 16,345,087
(43) SCHOOL FACILITY JOINT USE SUPPORT 500,000
(44) SCHOOL FOOD SERVICES 7,650,000
(45) SCHOOL FOOD-LEGISLATIVE AUDIT 75,000
(46) SCHOOL FUNDING CONTINGENCY 25,000,000
(47) SCHOOL RECOGNITION 7,000,000
(48) SCHOOL WORKER DEFENSE 390,000
(49) SERIOUS OFFENDER 1,716,859
(50) SMART START/SMART STEP 10,666,303
(51) SPECIAL EDUCATION - HIGH COST OCCURRENCES 17,934,000
(52) SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES 2,802,527
(53) SPECIAL NEEDS ISOLATED FUNDING 3,000,000
(54) STATE FOUNDATION FUNDING 2,206,861,456
(55) STUDENT GROWTH 37,690,144
(56) SURPLUS COMMODITIES 1,125,065
(57) TEACHER LICENSING/MENTORING 6,065,758
(58) TEACHER OF THE YEAR 100,000
(59) TEACHER RETIREMENT MATCHING 14,776,754
(60) TEACHER SALARY EQUALIZATION 60,000,000
(61) TECHNOLOGY GRANTS 3,602,678
(62) TECHNOLOGY IMPROVEMENTS 500,000
(63) TRANSPORTATION MODERNIZATION GRANTS 5,000,000
(64) WORKER'S COMPENSATION 450,000
(65) YOUTH SHELTERS 165,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,480,713,330

SECTION 2. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS PUBLIC SCHOOL COMPUTER NETWORK.
There is hereby established for the Department of Education - Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education - Arkansas Public School Computer Network
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) D105C ADE STATE NETWORK ENGINEER 1 GRADE IT09
(2) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT09
(3) D104C ADE STATE SYSTEMS ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE IT08
(4) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(5) D042C DATA WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(6) D037C ADE APSCN APPLICATIONS MANAGER 3 GRADE IT05
(7) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(8) D055C ADE APSCN FIELD ANALYST 25 GRADE IT04
(9) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE IT02
(10) N047N ADE APSCN DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(11) G012C ADE ASSISTANT TO DIRECTOR 3 GRADE GS12
(12) G050C ADE APSCN DIVISION MANAGER 3 GRADE GS10
(13) C020C STUDENT APPLICATIONS SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(14) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 45

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS PUBLIC SCHOOL COMPUTER NETWORK.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable
from the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School Fund
Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Arkansas Public
School Computer Network for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,629,680
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 945,587
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 29,245,839
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 7,250
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 200,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) DATA ACCESS IMPLEMENTATION 300,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $33,328,356

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - OFFICE OF EDUCATION RENEWAL ZONES. There
is hereby established for the Department of Education - Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education - Office of Education Renewal Zones for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) E020C ADE OERZ TECHNICAL ASSIST SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS08
(2) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - OFFICE OF EDUCATION RENEWAL ZONES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School Fund Account,
for personal services, operating expenses, and grants by the Department of
Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Office of
Education Renewal Zones for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $145,568
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 58,129
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 3,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) EDUCATIONAL RENEWAL ZONE GRANTS 1,101,150
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,332,847

SECTION 6. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
FUND ALLOCATION. The appropriation for the Isolated Funding line item in the
Grants and Aid to Local School Districts and Special Programs section of this
Act may be fully funded. Any funding and appropriation for Isolated Funding
that is not utilized shall be transferred to the appropriation for Special
Needs Isolated Funding in the Grants and Aid to Local School Districts and
Special Programs section of this Act and shall be used there for fully
funding each subsection (c) through (f) of Arkansas Code § 6-20-604 on a pro
rata basis until the available funds are exhausted. Pro rata basis is defined
as providing each district qualifying for additional funding under
subsections (c) through (f) a proportionate share based on how each
district's additional funding amount bears to the total additional funding
amounts for all qualifying districts. If any funding and appropriation
remains after funding each subsection (c) through (f) of Arkansas Code § 6-
20-604 the remaining balance shall be used to fund the provisions of Arkansas
Code § 6-20-604 (h) on an equal basis until the available funds are
exhausted.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 7. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
GRANTS TO SCHOOL DISTRICTS. For the purposes of distributing the Grants To
School Districts appropriation in the Grants and Aid to Local School
Districts and Special Programs section of this Act, "school district" means a
school district which contracts with a school district in an adjoining state
for the education of some of the pupils within the Arkansas school district
because the portion of the school district wherein such pupils live is
completely separated from the remainder of the school district by a reservoir
covering at least 12,000 acres at normal water level, and where to attend
school in their own district, the pupils of said portion would be required to
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
travel or to be transported a distance (measured by the nearest highway or
road route) of more than 35 miles round trip and pass through another school
district or districts. The Department of Education shall distribute the
monies appropriated for Grants to School Districts in the Grants and Aid to
Local School Districts and Special Programs section of this Act to such
school districts as reimbursement for expenses incurred in educating the
pupils residing in the separated portion of the school district. The payments
are to be limited to the amount of available appropriation. Such school
districts shall file a request for reimbursement with the Department of
Education and provide the Department of Education with such documentation as
is deemed necessary.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
SPECIAL EDUCATION SERVICES. The funds appropriated in the line item "Special
Education Services" in the Grants and Aid to Local School Districts and
Special Programs section of this Act shall be used to provide extended year
summer programs for handicapped students in need of such services, to provide
special education services to foster children who are wards of the State, and
to provide funds for the payment of salaries of special education
supervisors. The Department of Education shall distribute such funds in the
manner necessary to carry out the intent of this Section.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
TRANSFER AUTHORITY. The Commissioner of the Department of Education, with the
approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and after approval by the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, is hereby authorized
to request necessary appropriation transfers and any other budget related
adjustments necessary within the Department of Education. Provided, however,
that the Department of Education shall be limited to submitting no more than
two transfer requests during any fiscal year.
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly
has determined that the Department of Education may operate more efficiently
if some flexibility is provided to the Commissioner of the Department of
Education authorizing broad powers under the Transfer Authority provision
herein. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The
requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional
by a court jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
AETN DOCUMENTED QUIZ BOWL COSTS. Of the total amount of appropriation and
funds authorized herein to the Department of Education for the Quiz Bowl each
fiscal year, an amount not to exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000) each
fiscal year may be made available to the Department of Education -
Educational Television Division for its documented costs associated with the
Quiz Bowl.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
RETIREMENT MATCHING. Beginning with the 1996-97 school year, Local School
Districts shall pay the teacher retirement employer contribution rate for any
eligible employee in accordance with rules and regulations established by the
Teacher Retirement Board of Directors. The appropriation contained herein for
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
Teacher Retirement Matching each fiscal year shall be used to provide the
employer matching for employees of the Cooperative Education Services Areas,
Vocational Centers, Arkansas Easter Seals and the school operated by the
Department of Correction.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
BETTER CHANCE PROGRAM ADMINISTRATIVE FEES. The Department of Education is
hereby authorized to expend a maximum of two percent (2%) of available funds
for administration of the Better Chance Program. Up to 1.8% of available
funds shall be used to administer the program and to monitor program grantees
to ensure compliance with programmatic standards. Prior to the utilization of
the remaining 0.2% of available funds, the Department of Education shall seek
prior review and approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee by providing a written request to include the following: a) the
Department's reason(s) for the use of the funds and b) the amount of funds
that will be expended. The Department may contract with the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education to administer the program.
Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount of
appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year
is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and
the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by
amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Therefore, it is both necessary
and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring
prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as
provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section.
If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction,
this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD - ARKANSAS BETTER CHANCE. Any unexpended balance of monies
allocated for the Arkansas Better Chance for School Success Program remaining
on June 30, 2025 2026, in the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
Public School Fund Account shall be designated and retained for the Arkansas
Better Chance for School Success Program.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein,
may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee all
amounts carried forward by the September Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee meeting which report shall include the name of the
Agency, Board, Commission or Institution and the amount of the funding
carried forward, the program name or line item, the funding source of that
appropriation and a copy of the written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS/STRIVE PROGRAM TRANSFER. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
shall transfer on his books and those of the State Treasurer and the State
Auditor, the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) during each
fiscal year from the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public
School Fund Account to the University of Arkansas at Little Rock Fund,
specifically to provide funding for the Arkansas/STRIVE Program. The total
amount of funds transferred each fiscal year pursuant to this section shall
not be subject to any indirect costs by the University of Arkansas at Little
Rock.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS GOVERNOR’S SCHOOL FUNDING. The Department of Education shall
allocate, budget and commit for expenditure two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000), in addition to funds already being provided for the
Arkansas Governor’s School, to fund the appropriation authorized from general
revenue for the Gifted and Talented program as appropriated in the Grants and
Aid to Local School Districts and Special Programs section herein. With this
additional funding either the department shall increase the number of grants
for AEGIS summer enrichment programs, or the duration of the Arkansas
Governor’s School shall be extended from four (4) weeks to six (6) weeks.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
EAST FUNDING PROVISION. Of the total amount appropriated for Technology
Grants each fiscal year, an amount of not less than three million five
thousand dollars ($3,005,000) or eighteen percent (18%), whichever is greater
each fiscal year, shall be awarded through a grant or professional services
contract for the EAST Initiative. Not less than one million dollars
($1,000,000) of the three million five thousand dollars ($3,005,000) or
eighteen percent (18%) of the Technology Grants Line Item awarded to the EAST
Initiatives shall be used for EAST infrastructure and personnel growth for
the establishment of new programs. The remaining funding shall be used for
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
existing EAST infrastructure, personnel, and operating expenses of the EAST
Initiative. The EAST infrastructure grant or contract for personal services
and operating expenses shall be awarded to an entity that has personnel or
experience, or both, in implementing the EAST Initiative.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 17. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
INTERVENTION BLOCK GRANTS FUNDING RESTRICTION. The Department of Education
shall make available from the Intervention Block Grants appropriation
authorized by this Act, one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) each fiscal
year for the annual expenses of the Quiz Bowl, thirteen thousand five hundred
dollars ($13,500) each fiscal year for Creativity in Arkansas, Inc. for
grants up to $1,000 each for students and chaperones, thirteen thousand five
hundred dollars ($13,500) each fiscal year for Destination Imagination, one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) each fiscal year for the State History
Day Competition, and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) each fiscal year
for a grant to the Arkansas Science Fair Association for grants to regional
and the state science fairs. The Department of Education shall allocate
General Revenue funding totaling no less than three hundred two thousand
dollars ($302,000) each fiscal year from the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education Public School Fund Account to support the annual expenses
of the Quiz Bowl, the Creativity in Arkansas, Inc. for grants up to $1,000
each for students and chaperones, Destination Imagination, the State History
Day Competition, and the Arkansas Science Fair Association for grants to
regional and state science fairs. The Department shall either expend or have
committed for expenditure the monies allocated for the Quiz Bowl, Creativity
in Arkansas, Inc., Destination Imagination, the State History Day
Competition, and Arkansas Science Fair Association grants as authorized
herein in order to fulfill the provisions of this section.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT.
(a) Of the total amount appropriated for Professional Development
Funding, three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) may be
authorized by the Commissioner of the Department of Education to be used by
the Department of Education to develop and implement statewide professional
development support systems for teachers that will benefit student
achievement.
(b)(1) The Department of Education shall annually report the following
information concerning the Arkansas Online Professional Development
Initiative under § 6-17-707:
(1) Annual expenditure information;
(2) Statistical information pertaining to users of the
initiative;
(3) Course offerings;
(4) Course hours completed; and
(5) Certificates awarded.
(2) The report under subsection (b)(1) of this section shall be
annually submitted by August 1 to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is
in session, the Joint Budget Committee;
(3) Senate Committee on Education;
(4) House Committee on Education; and
(5) Department of Finance and Administration.
(c) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 19. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ESA MATCHING GRANT PROGRAM.
(a)(1) Of the appropriation and funding for the ESA MATCHING GRANT
PROGRAM Item in the Grants and Aid to Local School Districts and Special
Programs section of this Act, five million three hundred thousand dollars
($5,300,000) shall be set aside by the Department of Education and shall be
used for school district expenditures for evidence-based programs to improve
academic achievement of identified national school lunch students.
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
(2) These programs shall be limited to:
(A) Tutors as set out in § 6-20-2305(b)(4)(C)(i)(b)(4);
(B) Before-school academic programs and after-school academic
programs, including transportation to and from the programs
under § 6-20-2305(b)(4)(C)(i)(b)(2); and
(C) Prekindergarten programs under § 6-20-2305(b)(4)(C)(i)(b)(3).
(b)(1) Set aside funds authorized in subsection (a) of this section
shall be distributed to school districts on a dollar for dollar matching
basis of school district expenditures for programs under subsection (a) of
this section on a pro rata basis until the available funds are exhausted.
(2) As used in this subsection, "pro rata basis" means providing
each district qualifying for additional funding in a proportionate share
based on how each district's expenditure bears to the total of funding
provided in subsection (a) of this section for all qualifying districts as
determined by the Department of Education.
(c) If any funding remains after funding subsection (b) of this
section, that remaining balance shall be carried over to the following fiscal
year for the same purposes as provided in this section.
(d) The Department of Education shall adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.
(e) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
R.I.S.E. ARKANSAS. The appropriation for the R.I.S.E. Arkansas line item in
the Grants and Aid to Local School Districts and Special Programs section of
this Act shall be used for the coordination of a statewide reading campaign
with community partners, parents, and teachers to establish the importance of
reading in homes, schools, and communities.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 21. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ENHANCED STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT FUNDING NAME CHANGE. Any appropriation titled
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
"ENHANCED STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT FUNDING" or abbreviated as "ESA" as named by
SB605 of 2019 may also be known as "NATIONAL SCHOOL LUNCH" funding or
abbreviated as "NSL" and shall be used for the same purposes as set out in
law.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 22. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS GOVERNOR'S SCHOOL CURRICULUM. Prior to the beginning of the
Arkansas Governor's School Program each year, the Arkansas Department of
Education shall review and approve the proposed curriculum for the program
year and shall maintain oversight of its implementation for consistency and
accuracy.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 23. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. HIGH
QUALITY INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS. Of the amount appropriated from the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Public School Fund for
R.I.S.E. Arkansas, up to nine million five hundred thousand dollars
($9,500,000) may be used for the purchase and distribution of high quality
instructional materials in accordance with Arkansas Code § 6-17-429(f).
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 24. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. DIVISION
OF ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION PUBLIC SCHOOL FUND AND EDUCATIONAL
ADEQUACY FUND DISTRIBUTION AND FUND BALANCE REPORT. (a) The Department of
Education shall submit quarterly a "Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education Public School Fund Distribution and Balance" report to the Arkansas
Legislative Council PEER Subcommittee or, if meeting in a Legislative
Session, the Joint Budget Committee PEER/Review Subcommittee no later than
ten days prior to the Subcommittee's scheduled meeting date.
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
(1) The report shall summarize the current total fund balance and
the past five Fiscal Year ending total fund balances of the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education - Public School Fund.
(2) The report shall contain, cumulatively over the course of the
fiscal year, by quarter a summary of the itemized totals distributed from
each subfund of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education - Public
School Fund and each subfund shall be organized as restricted or unrestricted
in spending purpose.
(b) The Department of Education shall submit monthly an "Educational
Adequacy Fund Distribution and Balance" report to the Arkansas Legislative
Council PEER Subcommittee or, if meeting in a Legislative Session, the Joint
Budget Committee PEER/Review Subcommittee no later than ten days prior to the
Subcommittee's scheduled meeting date.
(1) The report shall summarize the current total fund balance and
the past five Fiscal Year ending total fund balances of the Educational
Adequacy Fund.
(2) The report shall contain the following:
(A) Monthly beginning fund balance;
(B) Monthly Distribution report with total distributions to
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public
School Fund Account and the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education Fund Account; and
(C) Amount of certified funding obligation remaining to the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public
School Fund Account and the Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education Fund Account for the fiscal year.
(c) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 25. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1206
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 26. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 27. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee











03-18-2025 16:56:36 KMW015